Alabama, session 2026rs, SB157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Page 1

BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
SB157 INTRODUCED
Section 1. Sections 36-21-210, 36-21-212, and
36-21-213, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
follows:
"§36-21-210
As used in For the purposes of this article, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) BODY-WORN CAMERA. An operational video or digital
camera or other electronic device, including a microphone or
other mechanism to capture audio, affixed to the uniform or
person of law enforcement agency personnel and positioned in a
way that allows the camera or device to capture interactions
between law enforcement agency personnel and others.
(2) CUSTODIAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY. The law
enforcement agency that owns or leases or whose personnel
operates the equipment that created the recording at the time
the recording was made. If another law enforcement agency
takes over the investigation of the recorded incident, that
agency becomes the custodial law enforcement agency for the
purposes of this article.
(3) DASHBOARD CAMERA. A device or system installed or
used in a law enforcement agency vehicle that electronically
records images or audio of interactions between law
enforcement agency personnel and others. This term does not
include a body-worn camera.
(4) DISCLOSE or DISCLOSURE. To make a recording
available for viewing or listening at a time and location
chosen by the custodial law enforcement agency. This term does
not include the release of a recording.
Page 2

not include the release of a recording.
SB157 INTRODUCED
(5) PERSONAL REPRESENTATIVE. A parent, court-appointed
guardian, spouse, or attorney of an individual whose image or
voice is the subject of the recording. If an individual whose
image or voice is the subject of the recording is deceased,
the term also means the personal representative of the estate
of the deceased individual; the deceased individual's
surviving spouse, parent, or adult child; the deceased
individual's attorney; or the parent or guardian of a
surviving minor child of the deceased.
(6)(4) RECORDING. A visual, audio, or visual and audio
recording captured by a body-worn camera, a dashboard camera,
or any other video or audio recording device operated by or on
behalf of a law enforcement agency or law enforcement agency
personnel when carrying out law enforcement responsibilities.
This term does not include any video or audio recordings of
interviews regarding agency internal investigations or
interviews or interrogations of suspects or witnesses.
(7) RELEASE. To provide a copy of a recording."
"§36-21-212
(a) Recordings A recording in the custody of a law
enforcement agency shall be disclosed to an individual or
personal representative only as provided by this article. This
article does not apply to the exchange of recordings between
law enforcement or prosecuting agenciesdeemed a public record
under Section 36-12-40 and subject to public inspection as
otherwise provided by law. An individual requesting disclosure
the release of a recording must make a written request to the
head of the custodial law enforcement agency that states the
Page 3

head of the custodial law enforcement agency that states the
SB157 INTRODUCED
date and approximate time of the activity captured in the
recording or otherwise identifies the activity with reasonable
particularity sufficient to identify the recording to which
the request refers.
(b) Nothing in this article shall limit or restrict the
application of the Alabama Rules of Civil Procedure as they
may be applied to the custodial law enforcement agency,
including, but not limited to, Rule 45, nor Chapter 21 of
Title 12.
(c) A custodial law enforcement agency may only
disclose a recording to the following:
(1) An individual whose image or voice is the subject
of the recording.
(2) A personal representative of an adult individual
whose image or voice is the subject of the recording if the
100 adult individual has consented to the disclosure.
101 (3) A personal representative of a minor whose image or
102 voice is the subject of the recording.
103 (4) A personal representative of an adult individual
104 under lawful guardianship whose image or voice is the subject
105 of the recording.
106 (5) A personal representative of an adult individual
107 who is incapacitated and unable to provide consent to
108 disclosure whose image or voice is the subject of the
109 recording.
110 (6) A personal representative of a deceased individual
111 whose image or voice is the subject of the recording.
112 (d)(c) When disclosing releasing a recording, the
Page 4

(d)(c) When disclosing releasing a recording, the
SB157 INTRODUCED
113 custodial law enforcement agency shall disclose release only
114 those portions of the recording that are relevant to the
115 individual's request.
116 (e) An individual who receives disclosure pursuant to
117 this section shall not record or copy the recording.
118 (d)(1) An individual whose request for the release of a
119 recording is denied by a law enforcement agency may file a
120 petition for judicial review in the circuit court of the
121 county where the individual resides or where the law
122 enforcement agency is located.
123 (2) A circuit court may uphold a denial to release a
124 recording only if the release would substantially interfere
125 with an ongoing investigation or prosecution, including, but
126 not limited to, endangering the safety of a witness or a
127 confidential source."
128 "§36-21-213
129 (a) Upon Not more than 30 days after receipt of the
130 written request for disclosurerelease and payment of a
131 reasonable fee, not to exceed the actual cost of producing the
132 recording, as promptly as possible, the custodial law
133 enforcement agency shall do either of the following:
134 (1) Disclose Release the portion of the recording
135 relevant to the individual's request.
136 (2) Notify the requestor of the custodial law
137 enforcement agency's decision not to disclose release the
138 recording if the release of . A custodial law enforcement
139 agency may choose to not disclose the recording if the
140 disclosure would affect substantially interfere with an
Page 5

disclosure would affect substantially interfere with an
SB157 INTRODUCED
141 ongoing active law enforcement investigation or prosecution.
142 (b) A custodial law enforcement agency may charge a
143 reasonable fee for redaction and editing of a recording."
144 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
145 1, 2026.
Page 6